Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202548-1105
Unlawful employment practice for employment agency.

It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employment agency to:

(1) Fail or refuse to refer for employment, or otherwise to discriminate against, any individual because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status; or

(2) Classify or refer for employment any individual on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 5, p. 785;

Laws 1973, LB 266, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 161, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 80.